Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB431.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Artificial intelligence." A machine-based system that can, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 for a given set of explicit or implicit objectives, make predictions, content, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(1) perceive real and virtual environments;(2) abstract perceptions made under paragraph (1) into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(3) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under paragraphs (1) and (2).* * *"Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 709. Acceptable denials.(a) Requests submitted by electronic means.-- An EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C), AN agency may deny a records request submitted by electronic means if any of the following apply:(1) The agency's open-records officer or information technology professional reasonably believes that downloading attached documents or accessing hyperlinks within the request could pose a cybersecurity risk to the agency's network. This paragraph shall not be construed to conflict with an agency receiving or accepting a request under section 505(a).(2) The agency has reasonable suspicion that the request 20250SB0431PN1281 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 was automatically generated by a computer program, script, artificial intelligence or generative artificial intelligence.(b) Appeal.--A requester may appeal a denial issued under subsection (a) as provided under Chapter 11.(C) EXCEPTIONS.--SUBSECTION (A) SHALL NOT APPLY TO:(1) A REQUEST BY AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY, OR CONNECTED WITH, A NEWSPAPER OR MAGAZINE OF GENERAL CIRCULATION, WEEKLY PUBLICATION, PRESS ASSOCIATION OR RADIO OR TELEVISION STATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF OBTAINING FOR PUBLICATION OR BROADCAST.(2) A REQUEST BY A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION FOR THE CONDUCT OF EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0431PN1281 - 3 - <--12345678910111213